Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
98]

UNIFORM
ELECTRONIC LEGAL MATERIAL ACT

Section

98-1 Short title

98-2 Definitions

98-3 Applicability

98-4 Legal material in official electronic
record

98-5 Authentication of official electronic
record

98-6 Effect of authentication

98-7 Preservation and security of legal
material in

official electronic record

98-8 Public access to legal material in
official

electronic record

98-9 Standards

98-10 Uniformity of application and construction

98-11 Relation to Electronic Signatures in
Global and

National Commerce Act

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next